Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.100

Provision for successors to fiduciary positions.

Where a resulting state bank is not to exercise trust powers, the director shall not approve a merger or conversion until satisfied that adequate provision has been made for successors to fiduciary positions held by the merging state or national banks or the converting state or national bank.

[ 1994 c 92 s 147; 1955 c 33 s 30.49.100. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 10. Formerly RCW 30.49.100.]